California, session 20252026, SB1356.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7574.11 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7574.11. (a) An applicant seeking registration as a proprietary private security officer shall apply to the department on forms provided by the department.(b) An application for registration as a proprietary private security officer shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:(1) Submission of fingerprints for submission to the Department of Justice.(A) The department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all proprietary private security officer registration applicants, as defined by subdivision (f) of Section 7574.01, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.(B) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the department.(C) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal level response to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(D) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a).(E) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this section.(2) A fee that shall be at least fifty-five dollars ($55) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty dollars ($60).(c) Upon approval of an application for registration as a proprietary private security officer by the director, the chief shall cause to be issued to the applicant a registration card in a form approved by the director. A registration card shall be valid for two years from the date of issue.(d) A person may work as a proprietary private security officer pending receipt of the registration card if he or she the person has been approved by the director and carries on his or her their person a hardcopy printout of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s Internet Web site internet website and either a valid driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code or a valid identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code.(e) The fee for a lost or destroyed registration card shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The request for a replacement of a registration card, license, or certificate shall be made in the manner prescribed by the bureau.(f) A registered proprietary private security officer shall apply for renewal biennially with the department on forms provided by the department. The department shall charge a renewal fee that shall be at least forty dollars ($40) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed forty-four dollars ($44).(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.